Vermont, session 2025-2026, H628.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 15 V.S.A. § 1103 is amended to read:
§ 1103. REQUESTS FOR RELIEF
(a) Any family or household member may seek relief from abuse by
another family or household member on behalf of themselves or their children
by filing a complaint under this chapter. A minor 16 years of age or older, or a
minor of any age who is in a dating relationship as defined in subdivision
1101(3) of this chapter, may file a complaint under this chapter seeking relief
VT LEG #385965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.628
2026 Page 2 of 5
on the minor’s own behalf. The plaintiff shall submit an affidavit in support of
the order.
(b) Except as provided in section 1104 of this title, the court shall grant
relief only after notice to the defendant and a hearing. The plaintiff shall have
the burden of proving abuse by a preponderance of the evidence.
(c)(1) The court shall make such orders as it deems necessary to protect the
plaintiff or the children, or both, if the court finds that the defendant has
abused the plaintiff, and:
(A) there is a danger of further abuse; or
(B) the defendant is currently incarcerated under the supervision of
the Department of Corrections and has been convicted of one of the following:
murder, attempted murder, kidnapping, domestic assault, aggravated domestic
assault, sexual assault, aggravated sexual assault, stalking, aggravated stalking,
lewd or lascivious conduct with a child, use of a child in a sexual performance,
or consenting to a sexual performance.
(2) The court order may include the following:
(A) An order that the defendant refrain from abusing the plaintiff or
the plaintiff’s children, or both, and from interfering with their personal liberty,
including restrictions on the defendant’s ability to contact the plaintiff or the
plaintiff’s children, or both, in any way, whether directly, indirectly, or through
a third party, with the purpose of making contact with the plaintiff, including in
VT LEG #385965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.628
2026 Page 3 of 5
writing or by telephone, email, or other electronic communication, and
restrictions prohibiting the defendant from coming within a fixed distance of
the plaintiff, the children, the plaintiff’s residence, or other designated
locations where the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s children are likely to spend time.
(B) An order that the defendant immediately vacate the household
and that the plaintiff be awarded sole possession of a residence.
(C) A temporary award of parental rights and responsibilities in
accordance with the criteria in section 665 of this title.
(D) An order for parent-child contact under such conditions as are
necessary to protect the child or the plaintiff, or both, from abuse in accordance
with section 665a of this title. An order for parent-child contact may, if
necessary, include conditions under which the plaintiff may deny parent-child
contact pending further order of the court.
(E) If the court finds that the defendant has a duty to support the
plaintiff, an order that the defendant pay the plaintiff’s living expenses for a
fixed period of time not to exceed three months.
(F) An order that the defendant continue to pay household bills for
which the defendant was responsible at the time the plaintiff requested the
order for a fixed period of time.
(G) If the court finds that the defendant has a duty to support the
child or children, a temporary order of child support pursuant to chapter 5 of
VT LEG #385965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.628
2026 Page 4 of 5
this title, for a period not to exceed three months. A support order granted
under this section may be extended if the relief from abuse proceeding is
consolidated with an action for legal separation, divorce, or parentage.
(G)(H) An order concerning the possession, care, and control of any
animal owned, possessed, leased, kept, or held as a pet by either party or a
minor child residing in the household.
(H)(I) An order that the defendant return any personal documentation
in the defendant’s possession, including immigration documentation, birth
certificates, and identification cards:
(i) pertaining to the plaintiff; or
(ii) pertaining to the plaintiff’s children if relief is sought for the
children or for good cause shown.
(I)(J) An order awarding possession of a vehicle to the plaintiff for a
set period of time, provided that the plaintiff:
(i) is the owner or joint owner of the vehicle;
(ii) is the primary payor on the vehicle loan;
(iii) has primary possession or control of the vehicle; or
(iv) has been restricted from using the vehicle by the defendant.
(J)(K) An order requiring the defendant to complete a domestic
violence accountability program approved by the Council on Domestic
Violence. Failure to complete the program shall not be considered a crime for
VT LEG #385965 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.628
2026 Page 5 of 5
any purpose, including 13 V.S.A. § 1030, but may subject the defendant to
civil contempt proceedings pursuant to Rule 16 of the Vermont Rules of
Family Proceedings. Successful completion of the program shall be
considered a substantial change in circumstances for purposes of requests to
modify an order. A court may consider a defendant’s failure to successfully
complete the program when determining whether to extend an order.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385965 v.1